South Dakota, session 2026, HB1191.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 10-45:
The gross receipts from the sale of a firearm, as defined in § 22-1-2, occurring on
or after December first of each year, are exempt from the provisions of this chapter and
the tax imposed by it.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.